Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6035YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2162 Section 1. Section 481A.54, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person shall not shoot any rifle, 3 shotgun with a slug load, pistol, or revolver from any road, as 4 defined in section 306.3, subsection 8. 5